Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 197A.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of this chapter, ORS chapter 197, any
statewide land use planning goal,  rule of the Land Conservation and Development Commis-
sion or any order of the commission or Department of Land  Conservation and Development:
(1) The City of Roseburg Ordinance No. 3604,  dated August 26, 2024, and the Douglas
County Ordinance No. 2024-0901 are deemed  approved, acknowledged, effective and in com-
pliance with state laws regarding land use planning, and more specifically:
(a) The real property described in Exhibits A and B to the  City of Roseburg’s ordinance
is removed from the city’s urban growth boundary and is deannexed and removed from the
city’s boundaries;
(b) The real property described in Exhibit C to the City  of Roseburg’s ordinance is added
to the city’s urban growth boundary;
(c) The real  property described in Exhibit D to the City of Roseburg’s ordinance is an-
nexed to the city; and
(d) The amendments made to the comprehensive  plans, land use regulations, compre-
hensive plan maps, zoning maps and urban growth management agreement of the city and
county are approved and acknowledged.
(2) Within 30 days of the effective date of this 2025 Act,  the Director of the Department
of Land Conservation and Development shall issue an order:
(a) Acknowledging the amendments to the urban growth boundary,  city boundaries,
comprehensive plans, land use regulations, comprehensive plan maps, zoning maps and urban
growth management agreement of the City of Roseburg and Douglas  County consistent with
this section;
(b) Approving the city’s October 22, 2024, urban growth boundary exchange submission;
(c) Rescinding any  prior order or findings of the department or Land Conservation and
Development Commission inconsistent with this section; and
(d) Dismissing any appeal or objection of the city’s urban growth boundary  exchange
submission.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3921 (HB 3921-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3921 (HB 3921-INTRO) Page 2